Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 28 Tennessee Small Business Investment Company Credit Act
4-28-110. Report by TNInvestco — Annual, nonrefundable certification fee — Satisfaction of the requirements of § 4-28-106(a)(1) — Key persons.

Each qualified TNInvestco shall report the following to the department of economic and community development:

As soon as practicable, but no later than thirty (30) days after the receipt of designated capital:

The name of each participating investor from which the designated capital was received, including such participating investor's insurance tax identification number;

The amount of each participating investor's investment of designated capital; and

The date on which the designated capital was received;

On an annual basis, on or before January 31 of each year:

The amount of the qualified TNInvestco's remaining uninvested designated capital at the end of the immediately preceding taxable year;

Whether or not the qualified TNInvestco has invested more than fifteen percent (15%) of its total designated capital in any one (1) business;

All qualified investments that the qualified TNInvestco has made in the previous taxable year and the number of employees, including the number of minority and women employees, of each such qualified business at the time of such investment and as of December 31 of the preceding taxable year; and

For any qualified business where the qualified TNInvestco no longer has an investment, the qualified TNInvestco must provide employment figures for that company as of the last day before the investment was terminated;

Other information that the department may reasonably request that will help the department ascertain the impact of the TNInvestco program both directly and indirectly on the economy of this state; and

Within one hundred twenty (120) days of the close of its fiscal year, annual audited financial statements of the qualified TNInvestco, which must include the opinion of an independent certified public accountant, and an examination review of follow-on capital, jobs data and pacing requirement compliance also performed by the independent certified public accountant, prepared in accordance with audit and attestation standards established by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants. Information provided to the department pursuant to this section shall be kept confidential due to the proprietary nature of such information.

A qualified TNInvestco must pay to the department of economic and community development an annual, nonrefundable certification fee of five thousand dollars ($5,000) on or before April 1, or ten thousand dollars ($10,000) if later. No annual certification fee is required if the payment date for such fee is within six (6) months of the date a qualified TNInvestco is first certified by the department.

Upon satisfying each of the requirements of § 4-28-106(a)(1), a qualified TNInvestco shall provide notice to the department of economic and community development and the department shall, within sixty (60) days of receipt of such notice, either confirm that the qualified TNInvestco has satisfied such requirement of § 4-28-106(a)(1) as of such date or provide notice of noncompliance and an explanation of any existing deficiencies. If the department does not provide such notification within sixty (60) days, the qualified TNInvestco shall be deemed to have met such requirement of § 4-28-106(a)(1).

For the purposes of this subsection (d), “key person” means:

The TNInvestco investment managers listed in part II, item 6, of such TNInvestco's application under § 4-28-105; or

A list of investment managers as has been previously approved by the department of economic and community development under subdivision (d)(2) or otherwise.

A TNInvestco's success shall be deemed to depend, in particular, on the TNInvestco's key person or persons. On or before July 1, 2010, each qualified TNInvestco shall provide to the department of economic and community development a description of the TNInvestco's procedure for choosing a successor should any key person die, become legally incapacitated, or cease to be involved in the management of the TNInvestco for more than ninety (90) consecutive days. In the event that a majority of key persons do die, become legally incapacitated, or cease to be involved in the management of the TNInvestco for more than ninety (90) consecutive days for any reason, the commissioner of economic and community development, in consultation with the commissioner of revenue, the Tennessee Technology Development Corporation, or any other appropriate professional advisors, shall determine whether a new individual or individuals will be able to assume the role of key person so that the TNInvestco's performance will remain unimpaired. If the commissioner of economic and community development determines, in the commissioner's sole discretion, that the key person cannot be adequately replaced and the TNInvestco's performance therefore will be impaired, then any funds not already invested by the TNInvestco shall be deposited into the general fund unless the department of finance and administration has certified, pursuant to § 4-28-109, that the total amount of payments deposited in the general fund under this chapter equals or exceeds the total amount of revenue forgone pursuant to the credits used as provided in § 4-28-103. If the department of finance and administration has made such a determination, then any funds not already invested by the TNInvestco shall be deposited into the Tennessee rural opportunity fund to further support the state's economic development efforts.

To promote openness and transparency, a copy of each annual report received by the department of economic and community development pursuant to this section shall be posted on the Tennessee TNInvestco website that is maintained by the department of economic and community development.

Acts 2009, ch. 610, § 11; 2010, ch. 1142, §§ 13, 16, 30; 2014, ch. 611, §§ 3, 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 28, §§4-28-101 —4-28-127 (Acts 1977, ch. 303, §§ 1-16, 20-24, 27, 28; T.C.A., §§ 4-2801 — 4-2825; Acts 1979, ch. 327, § 1; 1981, ch. 142, §§ 1-6, 8-18; 1982, ch. 939, §§ 1, 2), concerning energy development, management and conservation, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 1. Section4-28-107 had previously been repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 142, § 7. For provisions concerning the office of energy programs of the department of economic and community development, see §§4-3-510 —4-3-515 and §§4-3-714 —4-3-730. For provisions concerning the office of energy management of the department of finance and administration, see title 4, chapter 3, part 10.

Acts 2010, ch. 1142, § 33 provided that the act shall apply to any entity certified as a TNInvestco, and to tax credits awarded, on or after July 9, 2009.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-28-111. Annual review — Summary of findings — Curing noncompliance.

The department shall conduct an annual review of each qualified TNInvestco to determine if the qualified TNInvestco is abiding by the requirements of the program and to ensure that no investments have been made in violation of this chapter. This review shall include the use of the scorecard data received from each qualified TNInvestco as provided in § 4-28-113. The department shall also compare this scorecard data to the qualified TNInvestco's original application to examine the investment strategy for accuracy and consistency and to ensure that statutory requirements and the department's policies are met each year. Information provided to the department pursuant to this section shall be kept confidential due to the proprietary nature of such information. The cost of the annual review shall be paid by each qualified TNInvestco according to a reasonable fee schedule adopted by the department.

The department shall provide the qualified TNInvestco a summary of findings including any areas of noncompliance. Failure to cure the areas of noncompliance within forty-five (45) days from the date of the notice of noncompliance shall result in a penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day until the noncompliance is cured. The proceeds from a penalty assessed pursuant to this subsection (b) shall be deposited into the Tennessee rural opportunity fund, to further the state's economic development efforts. Funds related to the investment tax credit shall not be used to pay the penalty imposed under this section.

The department of economic and community development shall provide the comptroller of the treasury and the state treasurer, upon request, a copy of any written findings made in connection with the annual review required under subsection (a) and a copy of the summary of findings provided to the qualified TNInvestco pursuant to subsection (b).

The department of economic and community development may promulgate rules to ensure compliance with the requirements listed in this chapter and the policies and procedures set forth by the department. Rules promulgated by the department may assess a penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per incidence for failure to comply with the requirements. The proceeds from any such penalty shall be deposited into the Tennessee rural opportunity fund to further the state's economic development efforts. Funds related to the investment tax credit shall not be used to pay the penalty imposed by the rules. Any penalty assessed may be netted against the annual management fee.

Acts 2009, ch. 610, § 12; 2010, ch. 1142, § 17; 2014, ch. 611, §§ 5-7.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 28, §§4-28-101 —4-28-127 (Acts 1977, ch. 303, §§ 1-16, 20-24, 27, 28; T.C.A., §§ 4-2801 — 4-2825; Acts 1979, ch. 327, § 1; 1981, ch. 142, §§ 1-6, 8-18; 1982, ch. 939, §§ 1, 2), concerning energy development, management and conservation, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 1. Section4-28-107 had previously been repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 142, § 7. For provisions concerning the office of energy programs of the department of economic and community development, see §§4-3-510 —4-3-515 and §§4-3-714 —4-3-730. For provisions concerning the office of energy management of the department of finance and administration, see title 4, chapter 3, part 10.

Acts 2010, ch. 1142, § 33 provided that the act shall apply to any entity certified as a TNInvestco, and to tax credits awarded, on or after July 9, 2009.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-28-112. Annual report.

The department of economic and community development shall make an annual report to the governor, the comptroller of the treasury, the state treasurer, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees having jurisdiction over taxes and economic development. The report must include:

The number of qualified TNInvestcos holding designated capital;

The amount of designated capital invested in each qualified TNInvestco;

The cumulative amount that each qualified TNInvestco has invested as of January 1, 2011, and the cumulative total each year thereafter;

The cumulative amount of follow-on capital that the investments of each qualified TNInvestco have created in terms of capital invested in qualified businesses at the same time or subsequent to investments made by a qualified TNInvestco in such businesses by sources other than qualified TNInvestcos;

The total amount of investment tax credits applied under this chapter for each year;

The performance of each qualified TNInvestco with regard to the requirements for continued certification;

The classification of the companies in which each qualified TNInvestco has invested according to industrial sector and size of company;

The gross number of jobs created by investments made by each qualified TNInvestco and the number of jobs retained;

The location of the companies in which each qualified TNInvestco has invested;

Those qualified TNInvestcos that have been decertified, including the reasons for decertification; and

Other related information as necessary to evaluate the effect of this chapter on economic development.

To promote openness and transparency, a copy of each annual report made by the department of economic and community development pursuant to this section shall be posted on the Tennessee TNInvestco website that is maintained by the department of economic and community development.

The department of economic and community development shall submit the annual report to the designees as specified in subsection (a) no later than the first Tuesday in September of the year following the year of the annual review of the TNInvestcos. If the report cannot be submitted by the first Tuesday in September deadline, the commissioner must notify the designees as specified in subsection (a) no later than thirty (30) days prior to the due date that the report will be late, the reasons why the report cannot be submitted in a timely manner, and an estimated submittal date.

Acts 2009, ch. 610, § 13; 2010, ch. 1142, §§ 18, 19; 2014, ch. 611, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 28, §§4-28-101 —4-28-127 (Acts 1977, ch. 303, §§ 1-16, 20-24, 27, 28; T.C.A., §§ 4-2801 — 4-2825; Acts 1979, ch. 327, § 1; 1981, ch. 142, §§ 1-6, 8-18; 1982, ch. 939, §§ 1, 2), concerning energy development, management and conservation, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 1. Section4-28-107 had previously been repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 142, § 7. For provisions concerning the office of energy programs of the department of economic and community development, see §§4-3-510 —4-3-515 and §§4-3-714 —4-3-730. For provisions concerning the office of energy management of the department of finance and administration, see title 4, chapter 3, part 10.

Acts 2010, ch. 1142, § 33 provided that the act shall apply to any entity certified as a TNInvestco, and to tax credits awarded, on or after July 9, 2009.

4-28-113. Investment stategy scorecard — Annual review — Compliance — Written findings.

Within ninety (90) days after the department of economic and community development provides notice to a TNInvestco, the commissioner of economic and community development and the commissioner of revenue, in consultation with the state treasurer, working with the TNInvestco, shall cause to be created an investment strategy “scorecard” for the TNInvestco. The “scorecard” shall contain not more than six (6) objective metrics or measures that will be used to reflect the investment strategy approved by the state, which strategy may, in the sole discretion of the commissioner of economic and community development, be modified from time to time upon written request of the TNInvestco to the commissioner of economic and community development.

The commissioner of economic and community development, in consultation with the commissioner of revenue and the state treasurer or any other appropriate professional advisors, shall conduct an annual review of each qualified TNInvestco, at the conclusion of each fiscal year, to determine whether the investment strategy used by the TNInvestco is in substantial compliance with the TNInvestco's scorecard.

If the commissioner of economic and community development reasonably determines that the investment strategy actually used by the TNInvestco is not in substantial compliance with the scorecard, then the commissioner of economic and community development shall provide the qualified TNInvestco a summary of findings including the areas of noncompliance. Within sixty (60) days of receiving the commissioner's findings, the TNInvestco shall provide to the commissioner of economic and community development a written statement that shall describe in detail the TNInvestco's plan for curing all areas of noncompliance before the next annual review. Said plan may include a request for modification of the strategy with corresponding changes in the scorecard which, if approved, shall become the scorecard against which future compliance will be measured.

If the commissioner of economic and community development reasonably determines, at the next annual review conducted pursuant to this section, that the TNInvestco has failed to cure such areas of noncompliance, a penalty in the amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) shall be imposed, and an additional penalty of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) shall be imposed for each year in which such noncompliance remains uncured.

The proceeds from any penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (c)(2) shall be deposited into the Tennessee rural opportunity fund to further the state's economic development efforts. Such penalty shall not be paid out of monies generated by the sale of investment tax credits under this chapter or any gain thereon.

The department of economic and community development shall provide the comptroller of the treasury, upon request, a copy of any written findings made in connection with the annual review required under subsection (b).

Acts 2010, ch. 1142, §§ 14, 20, 22, 23.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1142, § 33 provided that the act shall apply to any entity certified as a TNInvestco, and to tax credits awarded, on or after July 9, 2009.

4-28-114. Maintenance of website.

Any qualified TNInvestco that has received an allocation of investment tax credits pursuant to this chapter shall be required to maintain a website that provides information to the general public about the biographical and professional background of each member of the executive management team of the TNInvestco and of each member of the board or other governing body of the TNInvestco. The qualified TNInvestco shall also provide information to the general public on its website concerning the availability of capital pursuant to the program established by this chapter.

The department of economic and community development shall maintain at least one (1) web page that provides information to the general public about the TNInvestco program, including internet links to the websites of each qualified TNInvestco. Each qualified TNInvestco shall maintain an internet link on its website to the TNInvestco program web page of the department of economic and community development.

Acts 2010, ch. 1142, § 21.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1142, § 33 provided that the act shall apply to any entity certified as a TNInvestco, and to tax credits awarded, on or after July 9, 2009.

The TNInvestco web page can be found at: http://www.tn.gov/ecd/tninvestco/.

4-28-115. Liquidation of remaining state ownership interests — Method — Approval by treasurer.

Beginning on December 31, 2021, the department shall liquidate any remaining ownership interests owned by the state. Methods to liquidate remaining ownership interests include the sale of interests to a third party. The sale of any ownership interests shall be approved by the treasurer.

Acts 2014, ch. 611, § 10.